North Carolina statutes. Chapter 150B. Administrative Procedure Act.
Article 3. Administrative Hearings.
§ 150B-27.
Subpoena.

After the commencement of a contested case, subpoenas may be issued and served in accordance with

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 45. In addition to the methods of service in

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 45, a State law enforcement officer may serve a subpoena on behalf of an agency that is a party to the contested case by any method by which a sheriff may serve a subpoena under that Rule. Upon a motion, the administrative law judge may quash a subpoena if, upon a hearing, the administrative law judge finds that the evidence the production of which is required does not relate to a matter in issue, the subpoena does not describe with sufficient particularity the evidence the production of which is required, or for any other reason sufficient in law the subpoena may be quashed.

Witness fees shall be paid by the party requesting the subpoena to subpoenaed witnesses in accordance with

G.S. 7A-314

. However, State officials or employees who are subpoenaed shall not be entitled to witness fees, but they shall receive their normal salary and they shall not be required to take any annual leave for the witness days. Travel expenses of State officials or employees who are subpoenaed shall be reimbursed as provided in

G.S. 138-6

.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 66; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1987, c. 878, s. 6; 1991, c. 35, s. 3.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “The Problem of Procedural Delay in Contested Case Hearings . . .” under the North Carolina APA, see 7 N.C. Cent. L.J. 347 (1976).

§ 150B-28.
Depositions and discovery.

A deposition may be used in lieu of other evidence when taken in compliance with the Rules of Civil Procedure,

G.S. 1A-1

. Parties in contested cases may engage in discovery pursuant to the provisions of the Rules of Civil Procedure,

G.S. 1A-1

.

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-491, s. 2, effective January 1, 2008.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 2007-491, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-491, s. 2, effective January 1, 2008, deleted former subsection (b) which read: “On a request for identifiable agency records, with respect to material facts involved in a contested case, except records related solely to the internal procedures of the agency or which are exempt from disclosure by law, an agency shall promptly make the records available to a party.”

§ 150B-29.
Rules of evidence.

In all contested cases, irrelevant, immaterial and unduly repetitious evidence shall be excluded. Except as otherwise provided, the rules of evidence as applied in the trial division of the General Court of Justice shall be followed; but, when evidence is not reasonably available under the rules to show relevant facts, then the most reliable and substantial evidence available shall be admitted. On the judge’s own motion, an administrative law judge may exclude evidence that is inadmissible under this section. The party with the burden of proof in a contested case must establish the facts required by

G.S. 150B-23(a)

by a preponderance of the evidence. It shall not be necessary for a party or his attorney to object at the hearing to evidence in order to preserve the right to object to its consideration by the administrative law judge in making a decision or by the court on judicial review.

Evidence in a contested case, including records and documents, shall be offered and made a part of the record. Factual information or evidence not made a part of the record shall not be considered in the determination of the case, except as permitted under

G.S. 150B-30

. Documentary evidence may be received in the form of a copy or excerpt or may be incorporated by reference, if the materials so incorporated are available for examination by the parties. Upon timely request, a party shall be given an opportunity to compare the copy with the original if available.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1987, c. 878, s. 7; 1991, c. 35, s. 4; 2000-190, s. 4; 2012-187, s. 7.1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on administrative evidence rules, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 635 (1971).

For comment, “The Problem of Procedural Delay in Contested Case Hearings . . .” under the North Carolina APA, see 7 N.C. Cent. L.J. 347 (1976).

For article, “A Powerless Judiciary? The North Carolina Courts’ Perceptions of Review of Administrative Action,” see 12 N.C. Cent. L.J. 21 (1980).

For article, “Administrative Justice: No Longer Just a Recommendation,” see 79 N.C.L. Rev. 1639 (2001).

§ 150B-30.
Official notice.

Official notice may be taken of all facts of which judicial notice may be taken and of other facts within the specialized knowledge of the agency. The noticed fact and its source shall be stated and made known to affected parties at the earliest practicable time, and any party shall on timely request be afforded an opportunity to dispute the noticed fact through submission of evidence and argument.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “The Problem of Procedural Delay in Contested Case Hearings . . .” under the North Carolina APA, see 7 N.C. Cent. L.J. 347 (1976).

For article, “A Powerless Judiciary? The North Carolina Courts’ Perceptions of Review of Administrative Action,” see 12 N.C. Cent. L.J. 21 (1980).

For article, “Administrative Justice: No Longer Just a Recommendation,” see 79 N.C.L. Rev. 1639 (2001).

For article, “What Were We Thinking?: Legislative Intent and the 2000 Amendments to the North Carolina APA,” see 79 N.C.L. Rev. 1657 (2001).

§ 150B-31.
Stipulations.

The parties in a contested case may, by a stipulation in writing filed with the administrative law judge, agree upon any fact involved in the controversy, which stipulation shall be used as evidence at the hearing and be binding on the parties thereto. Parties should agree upon facts when practicable.

Except as otherwise provided by law, disposition may be made of a contested case by stipulation, agreed settlement, consent order, waiver, default, or other method agreed upon by the parties.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1987, c. 878, s. 6.

§ 150B-31.1.
Contested tax cases.

Application. — This section applies only to contested tax cases. A contested tax case is a case involving a disputed tax matter arising under

G.S. 105-241.15

. To the extent any provision in this section conflicts with another provision in this Article, this section controls.

Simple Procedures. — The Chief Administrative Law Judge may limit and simplify the procedures that apply to a contested tax case involving a taxpayer who is not represented by an attorney. An administrative law judge assigned to a contested tax case must make reasonable efforts to assist a taxpayer who is not represented by an attorney in order to assure a fair hearing.

Venue. — A hearing in a contested tax case must be conducted in Wake County, unless the parties agree to hear the case in another county.

Reports. — The following agency reports are admissible without testimony from personnel of the agency:

Law enforcement reports.

Government agency lab reports used for the enforcement of motor fuel tax laws.

Confidentiality. — The record, proceedings, and decision in a contested tax case are confidential until the final decision is issued in the case.

History.

2007-491, s. 42; 2008-134, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-134, s. 9, effective July 28, 2008, rewrote subsection (d).

§ 150B-32.
Designation of administrative law judge.

The Director of the Office of Administrative Hearings shall assign himself or another administrative law judge to preside over a contested case.

(a1)

Repealed by Sessions Laws 1985 (Regular Session, 1986), c. 1022, s. 1(15).

On the filing in good faith by a party of a timely and sufficient affidavit of personal bias or disqualification of an administrative law judge, the administrative law judge shall determine the matter as a part of the record in the case, and this determination shall be subject to judicial review at the conclusion of the proceeding.

When an administrative law judge is disqualified or it is impracticable for him to continue the hearing, the Director shall assign another administrative law judge to continue with the case unless it is shown that substantial prejudice to any party will result, in which event a new hearing shall be held or the case dismissed without prejudice.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1022, s. 1(1), 1(12), 1(15); c. 1028, s. 40; 1987, c. 878, s. 8.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “The Problem of Procedural Delay in Contested Case Hearings . . .” under the North Carolina APA, see 7 N.C. Cent. L.J. 347 (1976).

For article, “Lead Us Not into Temptation: Should Attorneys Who Contract to Provide Administrative Adjudication Services Be Insulated from Those Who Compensate Them?,” see 68 Duke L.J. 24 (2019).

For article, “Judicial Ethics:
Ethics and Judicial Independence in an Executive Branch Judiciary,” see 68 Duke L.J. 40 (2019).

§ 150B-33.
Powers of administrative law judge.

An administrative law judge shall stay any contested case under this Article on motion of an agency which is a party to the contested case, if the agency shows by supporting affidavits that it is engaged in other litigation or administrative proceedings, by whatever name called, with or before a federal agency, and this other litigation or administrative proceedings will determine the position, in whole or in part, of the agency in the contested case. At the conclusion of the other litigation or administrative proceedings, the contested case shall proceed and be determined as expeditiously as possible.

An administrative law judge may:

Administer oaths and affirmations;

Sign, issue, and rule on subpoenas in accordance with

G.S. 150B-27

and

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 45;

Provide for the taking of testimony by deposition and rule on all objections to discovery in accordance with

G.S. 1A-1

, the Rules of Civil Procedure;

(3a)

Rule on all prehearing motions that are authorized by G.S. 1A-1, the Rules of Civil Procedure;

Regulate the course of the hearings, including discovery, set the time and place for continued hearings, and fix the time for filing of briefs and other documents;

Direct the parties to appear and confer to consider simplification of the issues by consent of the parties;

Stay the contested action by the agency pending the outcome of the case, upon such terms as he deems proper, and subject to the provisions of G.S. 1A-1, Rule 65;

Determine whether the hearing shall be recorded by a stenographer or by an electronic device; and

Enter an order returnable in the General Court of Justice, Superior Court Division, to show cause why the person should not be held in contempt. The Court shall have the power to impose punishment as for contempt for any act which would constitute direct or indirect contempt if the act occurred in an action pending in Superior Court.

Determine that a rule as applied in a particular case is void because (1) it is not within the statutory authority of the agency, (2) is not clear and unambiguous to persons it is intended to direct, guide, or assist, or (3) is not reasonably necessary to enable the agency to fulfill a duty delegated to it by the General Assembly.

Impose the sanctions provided for in G.S. 1A-1 or Chapter 3 of Title 26 of the North Carolina Administrative Code for noncompliance with applicable procedural rules.

Order the assessment of reasonable attorneys’ fees and witnesses’ fees against the State agency involved in contested cases decided under this Article where the administrative law judge finds that the State agency named as respondent has substantially prejudiced the petitioner’s rights and has acted arbitrarily or capriciously or under Chapter 126 where the administrative law judge finds discrimination, harassment, or orders reinstatement or back pay.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-398, s. 17. For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1987, c. 878, ss. 5, 9, 10, 26; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1111, ss. 18, 19; 1991, c. 35, s. 5; 2000-190, s. 5; 2004-156, s. 4; 2011-398, s. 17; 2012-187, s. 7.2.

§ 150B-34.
Final decision or order.

In each contested case the administrative law judge shall make a final decision or order that contains findings of fact and conclusions of law. The administrative law judge shall decide the case based upon the preponderance of the evidence, giving due regard to the demonstrated knowledge and expertise of the agency with respect to facts and inferences within the specialized knowledge of the agency.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 35, s. 6.

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-398, s. 18. For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Except for the exemptions contained in

G.S. 150B-1

, the provisions of this section regarding the decision of the administrative law judge shall apply only to agencies subject to Article 3 of this Chapter, notwithstanding any other provisions to the contrary relating to recommended decisions by administrative law judges.

An administrative law judge may grant judgment on the pleadings, pursuant to a motion made in accordance with

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 12(c), or summary judgment, pursuant to a motion made in accordance with

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 56, that disposes of all issues in the contested case. Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, a decision granting a motion for judgment on the pleadings or summary judgment need not include findings of fact or conclusions of law, except as determined by the administrative law judge to be required or allowed by G.S. 1A-1, Rule 12(c), or Rule 56.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1987, c. 878, ss. 5, 23; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1111, s. 21; 1991, c. 35, s. 6; 2000-190, s. 6; 2011-398, s. 18.

Department of Health and Human Services Waiver Application.

Session Laws 2011-398, s. 55.1, provides: “Pursuant to 31 U.S.C. § 6504, the Department of Health and Human Services shall request a waiver from the single State agency requirement contained in 42 C.F.R. § 432.10(e)(3) with regard to final decisions in administrative hearings. The waiver application shall include the following:

“(1) The waiver request is made at the direction of the North Carolina General Assembly, which is responsible for the organizational structure of State government.

“(2) The single State agency requirement prevents the establishment of the most effective and efficient arrangement for providing administrative hearings to claimants because it requires that after a hearing and decision by an administrative law judge, the case must be returned to the agency for a final decision. The return to the agency is an unnecessary, time-consuming, and costly additional step.

“(3) The use of another State administrative hearings arrangement will not endanger the objectives of the law authorizing the Medicaid program because the administrative law judges will abide by the properly adopted policies, rules, and regulations of the State Medicaid agency in making final decisions.”

Session Laws 2011-398, s. 55.2, as amended by Session Laws 2012-187, s. 7.3, provides: “If necessary to effectuate the purposes of this act, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall seek United States Environmental Protection Agency approval to become an agency responsible for administering programs under the federal Clean Water Act, 33 U.S.C. § 1251 et seq., the Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. § 7401 et seq., and the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act, 42 U.S.C. § 6901 et seq. On or before December 31, 2011, the Office of Administrative Hearings and the Department of Environment and Natural Resources shall jointly develop and submit any Memoranda of Agreement, delineations of programmatic responsibility, procedure for coordination, and other information that United States Environmental Protection Agency may require in order to effectuate any necessary approval process.”

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 10.40(B)(a), expiring 30 days from the date of the Department’s decision on the new certificate of need or adjournment sine die of the 2005 General Assembly, whichever occurs later, provides: “Notwithstanding provisions to the contrary in Chapter 150B and Article 9 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes, a licensed health care facility in operation on July 1, 2005, under a certificate of need issued by the Department of Health and Human Services prior to that date and subsequently invalidated based on a procedural defect in the awarding of the certificate of need, may remain in operation for the purpose of applying for a new certificate of need in accordance with Article 9 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes. The health care facility may remain in operation for the period pending the decision of the Department on the application for the new certificate of need.”

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2005’.”

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 46.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2005-2007 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 46.5 is a severability clause.

§ 150B-35.
No ex parte communication; exceptions.

Unless required for disposition of an ex parte matter authorized by law, the administrative law judge assigned to a contested case may not communicate, directly or indirectly, in connection with any issue of fact, or question of law, with any person or party or his representative, except on notice and opportunity for all parties to participate.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1987, c. 878, s. 11; 2011-398, s. 19.

§ 150B-36.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-398, s. 20.
For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1975, 2nd Sess., c. 983, s. 67; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1022, s. 1(16); 1987, c. 878, ss. 12, 24; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1111, s. 20; 1991, c. 35, s. 7; 2000-190, s. 7; 2009-51, s. 1; 2011-332, s. 2.2; repealed by 2011-398, s. 20.

§ 150B-37.
Official record.

In a contested case, the Office of Administrative Hearings shall prepare an official record of the case that includes:

Notices, pleadings, motions, and intermediate rulings;

Questions and offers of proof, objections, and rulings thereon;

Evidence presented;

Matters officially noticed, except matters so obvious that a statement of them would serve no useful purpose; and

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 878, s. 25.

The administrative law judge’s final decision or order.

Proceedings at which oral evidence is presented shall be recorded, but need not be transcribed unless requested by a party. Each party shall bear the cost of the transcript or part thereof or copy of said transcript or part thereof which said party requests, and said transcript or part thereof shall be added to the official record as an exhibit.

The Office of Administrative Hearings shall forward a copy of the administrative law judge’s final decision to each party.

History.

1973, c. 1331, s. 1; 1985, c. 746, s. 1; 1987, c. 878, ss. 13, 25; 2000-190, s. 8; 2011-398, s. 21.